District of Columbia statutes.
1-144

Inside public buildings.

The flag of the District of Columbia shall be displayed inside all public buildings whenever and wherever the flag of the United States is displayed.

July 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-121, § 5, 29 DCR 2072
1981 Ed., § 1-124.